inc/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ANiySUFF_PL !!= * @CODE@
<  "+Px1Sg":0 0:i2 0:y                 "@U.noun.1sg@"  >  PLak ; !
<  "+Px2Sg":0 0:i2 0:y                  "@U.noun.2sg@"  >  PLak ; !
<  "+Px3Sg":0 0:i2 0:y         "@U.noun.3sg@"  >  OBVIATIVE ; !
<  "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w  "@U.noun.4sg@" >  OBVIATIVE ; !obviative plural possessor, hence Pl is -a
<  "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  >  PLak ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w     "@U.noun.12pl@" >  PLak ; ! inclusive Pl
<  "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  >  PLak ; !
<  "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w     "@U.noun.3pl@"  >  OBVIATIVE ; !
<  "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w    "@U.noun.4sg@" >  OBVIATIVE ; ! obviative plural possessor, hence Pl is -a


!! !!Singular/plural suffixes



LEXICON SG_ !!= * @CODE@ 
 # ;


LEXICON PLa !!= * @CODE@ 
:%>a # ;


LEXICON PLak !!= * @CODE@ 
:%>ak # ;


!! !!Locative suffixes

LEXICON LOC !!= * @CODE@ 
+Loc:%>i2hk  # ;

LEXICON LOCahk !!= * @CODE@ 
+Loc:%>âhk  # ;

LEXICON LOCinaahk !!= * @CODE@ For collective locative
+Loc:%>i2nâhk  # ;

!! !!Obviative suffix
LEXICON OBVIATIVE !!= * @CODE@
+Obv:%>a # ;


!! !!Special cases
LEXICON NOPREFIX !!= * @CODE@ gives diacr.flag for no prefix. Used for hardcoded forms in the lexicon
< "@U.noun.abs@" > # ;
